Hawaii statutes.
§560:6-103 Ownership during lifetime.
(a) A joint account belongs, during the lifetime of all parties, to the
parties in proportion to the net contributions by each to the sums on deposit,
unless there is clear and convincing evidence of a different intent.

(b) A payable-on-death account belongs to the
original payee during the payee's lifetime and not to the payable-on-death
payee or payees; if two or more parties are named as original payees, during
their lifetimes rights as between them are governed by subsection (a) of this
section.

(c) Unless a contrary intent is manifested by
the terms of the account or the deposit agreement or there is other clear and
convincing evidence of an irrevocable trust, a trust account belongs
beneficially to the trustee during the trustee's lifetime, and if two or more
parties are named as trustee on the account, during their lifetimes beneficial
rights as between them are governed by subsection (a) of this section. If
there is an irrevocable trust, the account belongs beneficially to the
beneficiary. [L 1976, c 200, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next